Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.250

No-buy list database program—Scrap metal business to determine if customer is listed.

A scrap metal business shall, before completing any transaction under this chapter, determine whether such customer is listed in the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs no-buy list database program established and made available under RCW 43.43.885.

[ 2013 c 322 s 32.]